tests/numerals/percents.yaml
  "px numbers in nom":
    1<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "1%-ы"
    2<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "2%-ы"
    3<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "3%-ы"
    4<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "4%-ы"
    5<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "5%-ы"
    6<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "6%-ы"
    7<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "7%-ы"
    8<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "8%-ы"
    9<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "9%-ы"
    10<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "10%-ы"
    11<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "11%-ы"
    12<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "12%-ы"
    13<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "13%-ы"
    14<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "14%-ы"
    15<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "15%-ы"
    16<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "16%-ы"
    17<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "17%-ы"
    18<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "18%-ы"
    19<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "19%-ы"
    20<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "20%-ы"
    21<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "21%-ы"
    22<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "22%-ы"
    23<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "23%-ы"
    24<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "24%-ы"
    25<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "25%-ы"
    26<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "26%-ы"
    27<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "27%-ы"
    28<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "28%-ы"
    29<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "29%-ы"
    30<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "30%-ы"
    31<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "31%-ы"
    32<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "32%-ы"
    33<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "33%-ы"
    34<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "34%-ы"
    35<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "35%-ы"
    36<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "36%-ы"
    37<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "37%-ы"
    38<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "38%-ы"
    39<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "39%-ы"
    40<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "40%-ы"
    41<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "41%-ы"
    42<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "42%-ы"
    43<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "43%-ы"
    44<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "44%-ы"
    45<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "45%-ы"
    46<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "46%-ы"
    47<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "47%-ы"
    48<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "48%-ы"
    49<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "49%-ы"
    50<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "50%-ы"
    51<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "51%-ы"
    52<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "52%-ы"
    53<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "53%-ы"
    54<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "54%-ы"
    55<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "55%-ы"
    56<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "56%-ы"
    57<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "57%-ы"
    58<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "58%-ы"
    59<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "59%-ы"
    60<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "60%-ы"
    61<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "61%-ы"
    62<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "62%-ы"
    63<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "63%-ы"
    64<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "64%-ы"
    65<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "65%-ы"
    66<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "66%-ы"
    67<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "67%-ы"
    68<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "68%-ы"
    69<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "69%-ы"
    70<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "70%-ы"
    71<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "71%-ы"
    72<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "72%-ы"
    73<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "73%-ы"
    74<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "74%-ы"
    75<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "75%-ы"
    76<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "76%-ы"
    77<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "77%-ы"
    78<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "78%-ы"
    79<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "79%-ы"
    80<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "80%-ы"
    81<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "81%-ы"
    82<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "82%-ы"
    83<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "83%-ы"
    84<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "84%-ы"
    85<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "85%-ы"
    86<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "86%-ы"
    87<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "87%-ы"
    88<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "88%-ы"
    89<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "89%-ы"
    90<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "90%-ы"
    91<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "91%-ы"
    92<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "92%-ы"
    93<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "93%-ы"
    94<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "94%-ы"
    95<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "95%-ы"
    96<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "96%-ы"
    97<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "97%-ы"
    98<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "98%-ы"
    99<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "99%-ы"
    100<num><percent><subst><px3sp><nom> : "100%-ы"

  "px numbers in acc":
    1<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "1%-ын"
    2<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "2%-ын"
    3<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "3%-ын"
    4<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "4%-ын"
    5<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "5%-ын"
    6<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "6%-ын"
    7<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "7%-ын"
    8<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "8%-ын"
    9<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "9%-ын"
    10<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "10%-ын"
    11<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "11%-ын"
    12<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "12%-ын"
    13<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "13%-ын"
    14<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "14%-ын"
    15<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "15%-ын"
    16<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "16%-ын"
    17<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "17%-ын"
    18<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "18%-ын"
    19<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "19%-ын"
    20<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "20%-ын"
    21<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "21%-ын"
    22<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "22%-ын"
    23<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "23%-ын"
    24<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "24%-ын"
    25<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "25%-ын"
    26<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "26%-ын"
    27<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "27%-ын"
    28<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "28%-ын"
    29<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "29%-ын"
    30<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "30%-ын"
    31<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "31%-ын"
    32<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "32%-ын"
    33<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "33%-ын"
    34<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "34%-ын"
    35<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "35%-ын"
    36<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "36%-ын"
    37<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "37%-ын"
    38<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "38%-ын"
    39<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "39%-ын"
    40<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "40%-ын"
    41<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "41%-ын"
    42<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "42%-ын"
    43<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "43%-ын"
    44<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "44%-ын"
    45<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "45%-ын"
    46<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "46%-ын"
    47<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "47%-ын"
    48<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "48%-ын"
    49<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "49%-ын"
    50<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "50%-ын"
    51<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "51%-ын"
    52<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "52%-ын"
    53<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "53%-ын"
    54<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "54%-ын"
    55<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "55%-ын"
    56<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "56%-ын"
    57<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "57%-ын"
    58<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "58%-ын"
    59<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "59%-ын"
    60<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "60%-ын"
    61<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "61%-ын"
    62<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "62%-ын"
    63<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "63%-ын"
    64<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "64%-ын"
    65<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "65%-ын"
    66<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "66%-ын"
    67<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "67%-ын"
    68<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "68%-ын"
    69<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "69%-ын"
    70<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "70%-ын"
    71<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "71%-ын"
    72<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "72%-ын"
    73<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "73%-ын"
    74<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "74%-ын"
    75<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "75%-ын"
    76<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "76%-ын"
    77<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "77%-ын"
    78<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "78%-ын"
    79<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "79%-ын"
    80<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "80%-ын"
    81<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "81%-ын"
    82<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "82%-ын"
    83<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "83%-ын"
    84<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "84%-ын"
    85<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "85%-ын"
    86<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "86%-ын"
    87<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "87%-ын"
    88<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "88%-ын"
    89<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "89%-ын"
    90<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "90%-ын"
    91<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "91%-ын"
    92<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "92%-ын"
    93<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "93%-ын"
    94<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "94%-ын"
    95<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "95%-ын"
    96<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "96%-ын"
    97<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "97%-ын"
    98<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "98%-ын"
    99<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "99%-ын"
    100<num><percent><subst><px3sp><acc> : "100%-ын"
